Colorado, session 2026A, SB062.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) The use of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides,
referred to as "SGARs", should be restricted to licensed applicators to
safeguard public health, nontarget wildlife and domestic animals, and the
environment;
(b) Despite prior proposals and actions by the United States
environmental protection agency, SGARs remain widely accessible to the
general public;
(c) Statistics from America's Poison Centers indicate that children
5 years old and younger account for 75% of the approximately 3,100
annual human exposures to SGARs reported from 2019 to 2023;
(d) Preventive, permanent, or nonstructure-associated baiting with
SGARs prolongs the environmental presence of toxic chemicals and
increases the likelihood of primary and secondary exposure to companion
animals and wildlife, including birds of prey and mammalian carnivores;
(e) Integrated pest management strategies, which emphasize
exclusion, proper sanitation, and targeted removal, minimize harm and
constitute a humane, science-driven, and effective approach to rodent
control;
(f) In conjunction with using integrated pest management
strategies, limiting the use of SGARs to circumstances that involve
documented and persistent rodent activity, as verified by means such as
-2- 062

electronic rodent monitoring and as only a "last resort" could reduce
unnecessary exposure risks and cascading household, property, and
environmental impacts; and
(g) The department of agriculture's broad rule-making authority
includes the authority to adopt rules consistent with state and federal law
to further reduce the unintended exposure to SGARs, including the
adoption of rules that reflect the risk-reduction principles described in this
section.
(2) The general assembly therefore declares that restricting the use
of SGARs, while promoting integrated pest management strategies and
encouraging the targeted, structure-associated use of SGARs, will protect
Colorado's wildlife, children, and pets; will safeguard human health; and
will support humane, science-driven, and effective rodent control.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-9-103, add (13)
as follows:
35-9-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 9, unless the context otherwise requires:
(13) "SECOND-GENERATION ANTICOAGULANT RODENTICIDE"
MEANS A PESTICIDE CONTAINING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIVE
INGREDIENTS:
(a) BRODIFACOUM;
(b) BROMADIOLONE;
(c) DIFENACOUM; OR
(d) DIFETHIALONE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 35-9-118.5 as
follows:
35-9-118.5. Second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides
-3- 062

designated as restricted-use pesticides.
ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027, SECOND-GENERATION
ANTICOAGULANT RODENTICIDES ARE DESIGNATED AS RESTRICTED-USE
PESTICIDES AND THE COMMISSIONER SHALL RESTRICT THE DISTRIBUTION
AND USE OF THE PESTICIDES PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-9-108 (5).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-9-120, amend
(1)(j.5) and (1)(k); and add (1)(l) as follows:
35-9-120. Prohibited acts - deceptive trade practice.
(1) It is unlawful and a violation of this article ARTICLE 9 for any
person:
(j.5) To make a false statement in any invoice, record, report, or
application required under this article ARTICLE 9 or any rule promulgated
ADOPTED under this article; or ARTICLE 9;
(k) To make any fraudulent statements in any confidentiality
agreement authorized pursuant to section 35-9-109 or to violate any of the
provisions of said THE agreement; OR
(l) TO DISTRIBUTE OR USE SECOND-GENERATION ANTICOAGULANT
RODENTICIDES IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 35-9-118.5.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-4- 062

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- 062